Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-8,117
Rules and regulations.

The State Board of Education may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations to carry out the Nebraska Teacher Recruitment and Retention Act.

Laws 2023, LB705, § 49.
January 1, 2028